North Dakota, session 69, SB2179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 23.1-13-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
23.1-13-16. Inspection fees.
Every person licensed by the tax commissioner as a motor vehicle fuel or special fuels
dealer shall pay to the tax commissioner an inspection fee of one-fortieth of one cent per gallon
[3.79 liters] for every gallon [3.79 liters] of gasoline, kerosene, tractor fuel, heating oil, or diesel
fuel sold or used during a calendar month except those gallons sold out of state or those
gallons sold as original package sales as defined in chapters 57-43.1 and 57-43.2. The fee
must accompany the monthly report required in the following section and is due no later than
the twenty-fifth day of each calendar month for the preceding month. The tax commissioner
shall forward all money collected under this section to the state treasurer monthly, and the state
treasurer shall place the money in the general fund of the statedeposit the funds in the
department of environmental quality operating fund. The moneys must be used, subject to
legislative appropriations, for the state fuel inspection program. The tax commissioner shall
make available annually a report by licensed dealer listing the number of gallons [liters] of motor
vehicle fuel and special fuels upon which the inspection fee has been paid. The provisions of
chapters 57-43.1 and 57-43.2 pertaining to the administration of motor vehicle fuel and special
fuels taxes not in conflict with the provisions of this chapter govern the administration of the
inspection fee levied by this chapter.
Page No. 1 25.1036.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 2. EXPIRATION DATE. This Act is effective through June 30, 2027, and after that
date is ineffective.
Page No. 2 25.1036.02000